Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-1429.02
Human Trafficking Victim Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Human Trafficking Victim Assistance Fund is created. The fund shall contain money donated as gifts, bequests, or other contributions from public or private entities. Funds made available by any department or agency of the United States may also be credited to the fund if so directed by such department or agency. The fund shall be administered by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. All money credited to such fund shall be used to support care, treatment, and other services for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of a child. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2015, LB294, § 20.
May 20, 2015